Illinois, session 104th, HB444.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Farm Fresh Schools Program Act is amended 5by changing Section 1 as follows: 6    (105 ILCS 124/1)7    Sec. 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the the Farm 8Fresh Schools Program Act.9(Source: P.A. 96-153, eff. 1-1-10.)